New Jersey, session 221, S540.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  If a dog bites or otherwise injures a person in the presence of the dogs owner, the owner of the dog shall remain at the scene of the incident until the owner of the dog provides the person bitten or otherwise injured by the dog with their name, address, and contact information. b.    Any dog owner whose dog bites or otherwise injures another person in the owners presence, and who fails to comply with the requirements specified in subsection a. of this section, shall be guilty of a disorderly persons offense.  Notwithstanding the provisions of N.J.S.2C:43-3 to the contrary, for every conviction of an offense pursuant to this section, the person shall be fined not less than $500 nor more than $1,000, or be imprisoned for a term of not more than six months, or both. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.